src/morphology/stems/punctuation.lexc
! ================= !
! Punctuation marks !
! ================= !


LEXICON Punctuation


! Clause boundary symbols

          %,+CLB:%,      # ;
          %.+CLB:%.      # ;
        %.%.+CLB:%.%.    # ;
      %.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%.  # ;
               %:+CLB:%: # ;
          %;+CLB:%;      # ;
       ^excl+CLB:%!      # ; !^C^
          %?+CLB:%?      # ;
           …+CLB:…       # ;
           ¿+CLB:¿       # ; ! Only seen as noise.
           ¶+CLB:¶       # ;

        §+N+ABBR:§       # ; ! §:s	!
       §§+N+ABBR:§§      # ; ! §:ain	!
        $+N+ABBR:$       # ; ! $:s	!
        €+N+ABBR:€       # ; ! €:s	!
        £+N+ABBR:£       # ; ! €:s	!
        ®+N+ABBR:®       # ;
        ©+N+ABBR:©       # ;



         •+PUNCT:•       # ;
         -+PUNCT:-       # ; !hyphen
        --+PUNCT:--      # ; !double hyphen
         –+PUNCT:–       # ; !endash
         —+PUNCT:—       # ; !emdash
         ―+PUNCT:―       # ; ! even emmer dash?
         =+PUNCT:=       # ;
         &+PUNCT:&       # ;
         ++PUNCT:+       # ;
         `+PUNCT:`       # ;
         ´+PUNCT:´       # ;
         '+PUNCT:'       # ;

!       %%+PUNCT:%%      # ; ! This one causes problems in HFST
!       %"+PUNCT:%"      # ;
!       %*+PUNCT:%*      # ;
!        /+PUNCT:/       # ;
!      +/-+PUNCT:+/-     # ;
!       %~+PUNCT:%~      # ;

! Paired punctuation marks


        %"+PUNCT:%"      # ;
   «+PUNCT+RIGHT:«7      # ;
   »+PUNCT+RIGHT:»7      # ;
   %“+PUNCT+LEFT:%“      # ;
  %”+PUNCT+RIGHT:%”      # ;
   %‘+PUNCT+LEFT:%‘      # ;
  %’+PUNCT+RIGHT:%’      # ;
   %‹+PUNCT+LEFT:%‹      # ;
  %›+PUNCT+RIGHT:%›      # ;
   %(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(      # ;
  %)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%)      # ;
   %[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[      # ;
  %]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%]      # ;
   %{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{      # ;
  %}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%}      # ;
   %<+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%<%]  # ;
   %>+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%>%]  # ;
